District of Columbia statutes.
2-217.05

Repealed

Functions of the Commission.

Repealed.

Apr. 27, 1999, D.C. Law 12-268, § 6, 46 DCR 969
Oct. 14, 1999, D.C. Law 13-49, § 13(e), 46 DCR 5153
Oct. 4, 2000, D.C. Law 13-169, § 2(e), 47 DCR 5846
Oct. 20, 2005, D.C. Law 16-33, § 2382(b), 52 DCR 7503
1981 Ed., § 1-1153.5.
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, or Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Temporary Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Law 13-33, June 24, 1999, law notification 46 DCR 8698).
For temporary (225 day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, or Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Temporary Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Law 13-216, April 3, 2001, law notification 48 DCR 3458).
For temporary (90-day) addition of Subchapter II-B [1981 Ed.], see notes following § 2-217.01.
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, or Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-89, June 4, 1999, 46 DCR 5322).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, or Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Second Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 1999 (D.C. Act 13-160, October 18, 1999, 46 DCR 9214).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2 of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, or Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Congressional Review Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-342, May 9, 2000, 47 DCR 4666).
For temporary (90-day) amendment of section, see § 2(e) of the Equal Opportunity for Local, Small, or Disadvantaged Business Enterprises Emergency Amendment Act of 2000 (D.C. Act 13-415, August 14, 2000, 47 DCR 7296).
For temporary (90 day) repeal of section, see § 2382(b) of Fiscal Year 2006 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2005 (D.C. Act 16-168, July 26, 2005, 52 DCR 7667).